District of Columbia statutes.
28:3-113

Date of instrument.

(a)

An instrument may be antedated or postdated. The date stated determines the time of payment if the instrument is payable at a fixed period after date. Except as provided in section 28:4-401(c), an instrument payable on demand is not payable before the date of the instrument.

(b)

If an instrument is undated, its date is the date of its issue or, in the case of an unissued instrument, the date it first comes into possession of a holder.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 676, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(d), 42 DCR 467
1981 Ed., § 28:3-113.
1973 Ed., § 28:3-114.
This section replaces former Section 3-114. Subsections (1) and (3) of former Section 3-114 are deleted as unnecessary. Section 3-113(a) is based in part on subsection (2) of former Section 3-114. The rule that a demand instrument is not payable before the date of the instrument is subject to Section 4-401(c) which allows the payor bank to pay a postdated check unless the drawer has notified the bank of the postdating pursuant to a procedure prescribed in that subsection. With respect to an undated instrument, the date is the date of issue.